Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-227
State trust company; merger or consolidation with national banking association; procedure.

Any state trust company, with the approval of the Department of Banking and Finance, may, upon a vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its capital stock, merge or consolidate with a national banking association, as provided by federal law, by causing a certificate to be filed with the Department of Banking and Finance setting forth the resolution of the stockholders of the state trust company and that the resolution has been duly adopted by the holders of at least two-thirds of the capital stock of the trust company.

Laws 1959, c. 20, § 1, p. 145;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 43.